New Jersey, session 222, S560.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  There is established in the Department of Human Services a pilot program to develop coordinated, specialized treatment plans for individuals with behavioral health issues, including, but not limited to, mild-to-moderate mental health issues, emotional disturbances, and substance use disorders. b.    The department shall select two hospitals in each Regional Health Hub designated pursuant to P.L.2019, c.517 (C.30:4D-8.16 et seq.) to participate in the pilot program.  To the extent possible, the department shall seek to select for participation in the pilot program hospitals that are not currently affiliated with the Early Intervention Support Services program and hospitals that are connected with or demonstrate a plan to connect with the Regional Health Hubs health information network as well as the New Jersey Health Information Network. c.     Hospitals participating in the pilot program shall refer any patient presenting at the hospitals emergency department with a behavioral health issue, including, but not limited to, a mild-to-moderate mental health issue, emotional disturbance, or substance use disorder, which behavioral health issue does not meet the criteria for admission to inpatient care, to appropriate clinical behavioral health treatment and support services as are available in the community. d.    Each designated Regional Health Hub shall provide administrative and support services to member hospitals and community-based providers participating in the pilot program to help connect patients to appropriate behavioral health treatment and support services.  Each Regional Health Hub shall support the hospitals and community-based providers in the development of protocols that shall: (1) be designed to ensure that patients referred to care under the pilot program are provided timely referrals to behavioral health treatment and support services appropriate to the patients behavioral health and related social services needs, including, but not limited to, the Early Intervention Support Services program, medication-assisted treatment, cash assistance programs, housing assistance programs, and other appropriate services as may be available; and (2) include requirements for timely follow up with patients, transportation coordination services, and assistance in scheduling appointments for primary care services and other appropriate health care services. e.     To the extent possible, Regional Health Hubs providing referrals in connection with a behavioral health treatment plan developed pursuant to subsection c. of this section to a patient who is enrolled in the State Medicaid program shall seek to ensure that all such referrals are made to authorized Medicaid providers.  To the extent possible, Regional Health Hubs providing referrals in connection with a behavioral health treatment plan developed pursuant to subsection c. of this section to a patient who is enrolled in any other health benefits plan shall seek to ensure that all such referrals are made to providers who are in-network under the patients health benefits plan. 2.    a.  Subject to the approval of any State plan amendments or waivers applied for pursuant to subsection b. of this section as are necessary to secure federal financial participation for State Medicaid expenditures under the federal Medicaid program, the State Medicaid and NJ FamilyCare programs shall provide coverage for behavioral health services provided pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). b.    The Commissioner of Human Services shall apply for such State plan amendments or waivers as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this section and to secure federal financial participation for State Medicaid expenditures under the federal Medicaid program. c.     The Department of Human Services shall provide funding, as necessary, to Regional Health Hubs to support hospitals involved in the pilot program through the funding mechanisms identified in P.L.2019, c.517 (C.30:4D-8.16 et seq.). 3.    The Commissioner of Human Services and the Commissioner of Health may each adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as are necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.